trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
Abat/WY
Abellan/WY
Abraham/WY
Absaló/WY
Aciscle/WY
Adalsinda/WY
Adelf/WY
Adern/WY
Adroguer/WY
Afrodita/WY
Agatop/WY
Agileu/WY
Agostenc/WY
Agràs/WY
Aguilera/WY
Agustí/WY
Aiet/WY
Aimar/WY
Alabal/WY
Alabir/WY
Alamir/WY
Alaric/WY
Alavedra/WY
Albalac/WY
Albanès/WY
Alberc/WY
Albern/WY
Albert/WY
Alberó/WY
Albiny/WY
Albià/WY
Albuixec/WY
Alcamí/WY
Alcuí/WY
Aldeguer/WY
Aldovar/WY
Alegre/WY
Aleixandre/WY
Alerany/WY
Alfarràs/WY
Alfés/Y
Algaba/WY
Algueró/WY
Alipi/WY
Almar/WY
Almirall/WY
Alorda/WY
Alqueró/WY
Altabó/WY
Altelló/WY
Alubís/WY
Alzinelles/WY
Alzinet/WY
Alòs/WY
Amanda/WY
Amarí/WY
Amet/WY
Amigó/WY
Amorat/WY
Amós/WY
Ancil·la/WY
Andrea/WY
Anfós/WY
Anglesill/WY
Anguita/WY
Anscari/WY
Anscarina/WY
Anticó/WY
Antonijoan/WY
Antònia/WY
Aparici/WY
Apuleu/WY
Arafat/WY
Aranda/WY
Arbona/WY
Arcadi/WY
Ardement/WY
Arenols/WY
Argelaguet/WY
Argeric/WY
Argos/Y
Aribert/WY
Aristió/WY
Armajac/WY
Armelles/WY
Arnald/WY
Arner/WY
Arnulf/WY
Arquerons/WY
Arroyo/WY
Artal/WY
Artigal/WY
Artimany/WY
Arxé/WY
Ascó/WY
Asmonea/WY
Aspriuet/WY
Astor/WY
Atenògenes/WY
Aucell/WY
Auger/WY
Aulí/WY
Auremund/WY
Auspici/WY
Avellanet/WY
Avinent/WY
Azorín/WY
Edmund/WY
Efraïm/WY
Elena/WY
Elvira/WY
Enguix/WY
Ermengarda/WY
Erola/WY
Escaiola/WY
Escortell/WY
Escurçac/WY
Espanyol/VWY
Espigoler/WY
Espoi/WY
Esquerra/WY
Estanyol/WY
Esteve/WY
Estragué/WY
Estrany/WY
Eufrasi/WY
Eustaqui/WY
Expedit/WY
Henedina/WY
Hermínia/WY
Hilda/WY
Hiroshima/Y
Horta/VWY
Hubert/WY
Ignasi/WY
Isaci/WY
Ivorra/Y
Ivó/WY
Oferil/WY
Oliver/WY
Oléo/WY
Ordi/WY
Oriell/WY
Orpí/WY
Ortega/WY
Osca/WY
Ou/WY
Ultesà/WY
Usard/WY
abaixador/FVY
abarrancava/AZ
abatussada/EVY
abell/EVY
aboiava/AZ
abominació/GVY
abonador/FVY
abrigava/AZ
abriolar/CY
abrucès/JVY
abstenien/Z
abstinguin/CZ
absència/EVY
acabdillament/EVY
acabdillava/AZ
acaparador/FVY
accadi/KVY
accessòria/EVY
acensava/AZ
aciculifoli/KVY
acidòtic/FVY
acollonida/EVY
acolorar/CY
acordava/AZ
acorreràs/Z
acorriment/EVY
acotament/EVY
acte/EVY
actuada/EVY
aculturava/AZ
acusat/BVY
addicionable/EVY
adiaforesi/EVY
adiguessis/Z
adlàter/EVY
adminiculava/AZ
adobadora/EVY
adquirit/BVY
adriàtic/FVY
adveniu/CZ
advinguis/Z
aerodina/EVY
aerodinàmic/FVY
afarrossada/EVY
afeblit/BVY
aferrallava/AZ
afilador/FVY
afixat/BVY
aforar/CY
afusellament/EVY
afusellava/AZ
agambar/CY
aglevat/BVY
aglutinogen/VY
agradava/AZ
agre/EFVY
agregable/EVY
aguilot/EVY
aguller/EVY
aiguavessos/Y
aixadada/EVY
aixecava/AZ
ajupir/CY
alaiorenc/FVY
albardat/BVY
albuminosa/EVY
alcalinitzava/AZ
alcedínid/EVY
alentejana/EVY
aliada/EVY
alifàtica/EVY
allioli/EVY
allotjava/AZ
alquilada/EVY
alquímica/EVY
alzinera/EVY
al·lucinat/BVY
alçacavall/EVY
amanollava/AZ
amarrament/EVY
ambidextrisme/EVY
americanista/EVY
aminofenol/EVY
amnistiar/CY
amollava/AZ
amortització/GVY
anaclàstic/FVY
anacorètic/FVY
anares/Z
anarquitzant/CEVY
androdioica/EVY
andà/GVY
angostura/EVY
aniquilació/GVY
anivellava/AZ
annonari/EVY
anteridi/EVY
anticiclònica/EVY
antifaç/IVY
antinòmica/EVY
antiquari/KVY
antocianina/EVY
anuència/EVY
anàlgia/EVY
anéssim/Z
aparadora/EVY
apedregava/AZ
apergaminar/CY
apetibilitat/EVY
apocat/BVY
apoderava/AZ
aporugar/CY
apradada/EVY
apuntalament/EVY
apuntalava/AZ
apòsit/EVY
aranya/EVY
ardència/EVY
arecàcia/EVY
argumentat/BVY
arnada/EVY
arneser/FVY
arpejava/AZ
arramblat/BVY
arrelós/JVY
arremolín/Z
arreveixinat/BVY
arràs/Z
artaire/EVY
arterioscleròtica/EVY
arxipreste/EVY
asimptomàtic/FVY
asimètrica/EVY
assaonament/EVY
assemblava/AZ
assetjador/FVY
assiriobabilònica/EVY
astrologia/EVY
atabuix/IVY
ataquinava/AZ
ateleològic/FVY
atindrà/Z
atiranyava/AZ
atordit/BVY
atorronada/EVY
atrotín/Z
aturonat/BVY
augítica/EVY
aurinyacià/HVY
autografòmetre/EVY
autosuggestió/GVY
auxili/EVY
aveníem/Z
avesat/BVY
avingues/Z
avitarda/EVY
azepina/EVY
ecotò/GVY
edafòleg/EVY
edificava/AZ
efemèride/EVY
eixarmat/BVY
eixarrancada/EVY
eixiran/Z
eixíssim/Z
electriu/EVY
electròmetre/EVY
elevatòria/EVY
embalall/EVY
embalumava/AZ
embarbollar/CY
embessonava/AZ
embetumat/BVY
embotellador/FVY
embotigava/AZ
embotxada/EVY
emergida/EVY
emetitzava/AZ
emmagrit/BVY
emmenat/BVY
emmetxava/AZ
empanava/AZ
empantanegar/CY
empaperador/FVY
empedregava/AZ
emperesit/BVY
empitjorament/EVY
emplomava/AZ
empoquida/EVY
empresonava/AZ
enaltida/EVY
enaltidor/FVY
encadastrava/AZ
encambrat/BVY
encaperonava/AZ
encaputxat/BVY
encasquetat/BVY
encativava/AZ
encintat/BVY
enciriar/CY
encistava/AZ
encorcobida/EVY
encorreguem/CZ
encorreu/CZ
encuirat/BVY
encuiràs/Z
endevinadora/EVY
endreça/DEVY
endueu/CZ
endurem/CZ
endut/FVY
enfastijava/AZ
enfeudada/EVY
enfoscar/CY
enfosquiré/MNZ
enfugisses/Z
enfurrunyada/EVY
engallava/AZ
engegada/EVY
enginya/DEVY
engolfava/AZ
engrossida/EVY
enherbava/AZ
enlacrada/EVY
enllepissament/EVY
enlliçava/AZ
enquetiat/BVY
enraiar/CY
enranciré/MNZ
enrocat/BVY
enroscava/AZ
ensarrionat/BVY
ensimava/AZ
ensivellat/BVY
entatxonava/AZ
entendada/EVY
entenedor/FVY
entossava/AZ
entrediguera/Z
entrediu/Z
entrega/DEVY
entremirada/EVY
entreobren/CZ
entreobrírem/Z
entretindrem/Z
entretinguéssiu/Z
entreveiésseu/Z
entrevindrem/Z
entrevinguéssiu/Z
enumerada/EVY
envasava/AZ
enviduada/EVY
envoltava/AZ
enzimàtica/EVY
epitelioma/EVY
equilibratge/EVY
erosionava/AZ
erotògena/EVY
erviana/EVY
esberlava/AZ
esbrinadora/EVY
esbrollava/AZ
esbrotonat/BVY
escalava/AZ
escampavies/IVY
escapular/EVY
escarcanyava/AZ
escarufejada/EVY
escauré/TZ
esclatabufa/EVY
escolladura/EVY
escorcollava/AZ
escorrerem/Z
escotista/EVY
escridàs/Z
escrostonada/EVY
esdevenia/Z
esdevingui/DZ
esfingomielina/EVY
esfondrat/BVY
esgardís/VYZ
esguimbava/AZ
esllavissadís/BVY
esmaragdina/EVY
esmolsava/AZ
espantosa/EVY
espassada/EVY
espatllejava/AZ
espelleringada/EVY
espernetegava/AZ
espiciforme/EVY
espipellejar/CY
espitllerava/AZ
esportivitat/EVY
esprimatxat/BVY
esprovava/AZ
esquitxotejat/BVY
esquivava/AZ
esquizofrènic/FVY
estatitzava/AZ
estatuària/EVY
estenall/EVY
estiguera/Z
estintolar/CY
estiuava/AZ
estoica/EVY
estrafarà/Z
estrangeritzava/AZ
estratègica/EVY
estrop/EVY
estès/JVYZ
estípula/EVY
etnòloga/EVY
eulògia/EVY
evocava/AZ
excarcerat/BVY
excitada/EVY
exhortava/AZ
exoendocrina/EVY
exoftàlmia/EVY
exsudar/CY
extasiava/AZ
externa/EVY
ha/YZ
hagiografia/EVY
harmoniosa/EVY
hauran/Z
hemimorfisme/EVY
heptatònica/EVY
heterodí/HVY
hexaèdric/FVY
hibernava/AZ
hidrotrineu/EVY
hipúric/EVY
hisop/EVY
honrat/BVY
horticultor/FVY
ictiosi/EY
ideava/AZ
il·lustratiu/BVY
immediatesa/EY
implex/JVY
impossibilitava/AZ
impronunciable/EVY
inapercebut/BVY
incontrovertibilitat/EY
incorreguem/CZ
incorreu/CZ
inculcable/EVY
indisculpable/EVY
indulgenciava/AZ
inextingiblement/Y
infame/DEVY
inhabituat/BVY
innervava/AZ
insegmentat/BVY
insinuació/GY
intensificava/AZ
intercalar/CEVY
interdigués/Z
intersticial/EVY
intervenc/Z
intervinguessin/Z
intransmutabilitat/EY
inventariava/AZ
irregenerable/EVY
isobàric/FVY
o/EVY
objectivava/AZ
obrissen/Z
obsequiosa/EVY
obtenim/Z
obtingué/Z
obviat/BVY
obvindríem/Z
ocorreguera/Z
ocorri/DZ
oersted/EVY
oficiosament/Y
ombrívol/FVY
omnímode/FVY
ompla/DZ
omplíeu/Z
opugnació/GVY
opugnadora/EVY
originava/AZ
oripellat/BVY
ornitorínquid/EVY
ossaments/Y
osteoporosi/EVY
seria/DZ
ubèrrim/FVY
ultramuntanisme/EVY
unitat/EY
urbanitzava/AZ
Èdip/WY
àgil/EVY
àgrafa/EVY
